Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.26.070

Property interest of depositor or beneficiary.

(1) Neither a depositor nor a beneficiary has a property interest in a special deposit.

(2) Any property interest with respect to a special deposit is only in the right to receive payment if the bank is obligated to pay a beneficiary and not in the special deposit itself. Any property interest under this subsection is determined under other law.

[ 2024 c 23 s 8.]